Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5404
Employee of qualified employee leasing company; how treated.

An employee of a qualified employee leasing company shall be considered to be an employee of the client-lessee for purposes of the Rural Economic Opportunities Act if the employee performs services for the client-lessee. A qualified employee leasing company shall provide the Department of Revenue access to the records of employees leased to the client-lessee.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 4.